runtime/dict/uk_UA.aff
SFX ^ Y 730
SFX ^ ути и [^аеєиіїоуюя]нути
SFX ^ ути імо [^аеєиіїоуюя]нути
SFX ^ ути ім [^аеєиіїоуюя]нути
SFX ^ ути іть [^аеєиіїоуюя]нути
SFX ^ нутися лася нутися
SFX ^ нутися лась нутися
SFX ^ нутися лося нутися
SFX ^ нутися лось нутися
SFX ^ нутися лися нутися
SFX ^ нутися лись нутися
SFX ^ нутися нулася нутися
SFX ^ нутися нулась нутися
SFX ^ нутися нулося нутися
SFX ^ нутися нулось нутися
SFX ^ нутися нулися нутися
SFX ^ нутися нулись нутися
SFX ^ нутися нувся нутися
SFX ^ нутися нувсь нутися
SFX ^ нутися нувшись нутися
SFX ^ нутися нувшися нутися ###
SFX ^ утися уся нутися
SFX ^ утися усь нутися
SFX ^ утися ешся нутися
SFX ^ утися еться нутися
SFX ^ утися емося нутися
SFX ^ утися емось нутися
SFX ^ утися етеся нутися
SFX ^ утися етесь нутися
SFX ^ утися уться нутися
SFX ^ олотися елюся олотися
SFX ^ олотися елюсь олотися
SFX ^ олотися елешся олотися
SFX ^ олотися елеться олотися
SFX ^ олотися елемося олотися
SFX ^ олотися елемось олотися
SFX ^ олотися елетеся олотися
SFX ^ олотися елетесь олотися
SFX ^ олотися елються олотися
SFX ^ олотися елися олотися
SFX ^ олотися елись олотися
SFX ^ олотися елімося олотися
SFX ^ олотися елімось олотися
SFX ^ олотися елімся олотися
SFX ^ олотися еліться олотися
SFX ^ тися нься ятися
SFX ^ тися ньмося ятися
SFX ^ тися ньмось ятися
SFX ^ тися ньтеся ятися
SFX ^ тися ньтесь ятися
SFX ^ ати у осати
SFX ^ ати еш осати
SFX ^ ати е осати
SFX ^ ати емо осати
SFX ^ ати ете осати
SFX ^ ати уть осати
SFX ^ спитися зіп'юся спитися
SFX ^ спитися зіп'юсь спитися
SFX ^ спитися зіп'єшся спитися
SFX ^ спитися зіп'ється спитися
SFX ^ спитися зіп'ємося спитися
SFX ^ спитися зіп'ємось спитися
SFX ^ спитися зіп'єтеся спитися
SFX ^ спитися зіп'єтесь спитися
SFX ^ спитися зіп'ються спитися
SFX ^ ітися уся вітися
SFX ^ ітися усь вітися
SFX ^ ітися ешся вітися
SFX ^ ітися еться вітися
SFX ^ ітися емося вітися
SFX ^ ітися емось вітися
SFX ^ ітися етеся вітися
SFX ^ ітися етесь вітися
SFX ^ ітися уться вітися
SFX ^ ітися ися вітися
SFX ^ ітися ись вітися
SFX ^ ітися імося вітися
SFX ^ ітися імось вітися
SFX ^ ітися імся вітися
SFX ^ ітися іться вітися
SFX ^ стертися зітруся (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпруся (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітрусь (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпрусь (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітрешся (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпрешся (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітреться (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпреться (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітремося (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпремося (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітремось (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпремось (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітретеся (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпретеся (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітретесь (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпретесь (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітруться (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпруться (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітрися (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіприся (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітрись (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпрись (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітрімося (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпрімося (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітрімось (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпрімось (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітрімся (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпрімся (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ стертися зітріться (^|[^о])стертися
SFX ^ спертися зіпріться (^|[^о])спертися
SFX ^ ватися овуся (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися овусь (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися овешся (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися оветься (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися овемося (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися овемось (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися оветеся (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися оветесь (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися овуться (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися овися (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися овись (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися овімося (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися овімось (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися овімся (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ватися овіться (?<!і)[з]ватися
SFX ^ ати му жати
SFX ^ ати меш жати
SFX ^ ати ме жати
SFX ^ ати мемо жати
SFX ^ ати мете жати
SFX ^ ати муть жати
SFX ^ ати ми жати
SFX ^ ати мімо жати
SFX ^ ати мім жати
SFX ^ ати міть жати
SFX ^ тіти чу тіти
SFX ^ тіти чеш тіти
SFX ^ тіти че тіти
SFX ^ тіти чемо тіти
SFX ^ тіти чете тіти
SFX ^ тіти чуть тіти
SFX ^ нутися вся [аеєиіїоуя]нутися
SFX ^ нутися всь [аеєиіїоуя]нутися
SFX ^ нутися вшись [аеєиіїоуя]нутися
SFX ^ нутися вшися [аеєиіїоуя]нутися ###
SFX ^ литися іллюся [бвдз]литися
SFX ^ литися іллюсь [бвдз]литися
SFX ^ литися іллєшся [бвдз]литися
SFX ^ литися іллється [бвдз]литися
SFX ^ литися іллємося [бвдз]литися
SFX ^ литися іллємось [бвдз]литися
SFX ^ литися іллєтеся [бвдз]литися
SFX ^ литися іллєтесь [бвдз]литися
SFX ^ литися іллються [бвдз]литися
SFX ^ ти ла [^ус]ти
SFX ^ ти ло [^ус]ти
SFX ^ ти ли [^ус]ти
SFX ^ іти лю піти
SFX ^ іти еш піти
SFX ^ іти е піти
SFX ^ іти емо піти
SFX ^ іти ете піти
SFX ^ іти лять піти
SFX ^ іти у удіти
SFX ^ іти еш удіти
SFX ^ іти е удіти
SFX ^ іти емо удіти
SFX ^ іти ете удіти
SFX ^ іти уть удіти
SFX ^ іти и удіти
SFX ^ іти імо удіти
SFX ^ іти ім удіти
SFX ^ іти іть удіти
SFX ^ утися ися [^аеєиіїоуюя]нутися
SFX ^ утися ись [^аеєиіїоуюя]нутися
SFX ^ утися імося [^аеєиіїоуюя]нутися
SFX ^ утися імось [^аеєиіїоуюя]нутися
SFX ^ утися імся [^аеєиіїоуюя]нутися
SFX ^ утися іться [^аеєиіїоуюя]нутися
SFX ^ атися муся жатися
SFX ^ атися мусь жатися
SFX ^ атися мешся жатися
SFX ^ атися меться жатися
SFX ^ атися мемося жатися
SFX ^ атися мемось жатися
SFX ^ атися метеся жатися
SFX ^ атися метесь жатися
SFX ^ атися муться жатися
SFX ^ атися мися жатися
SFX ^ атися мись жатися
SFX ^ атися мімося жатися
SFX ^ атися мімось жатися
SFX ^ атися мімся жатися
SFX ^ атися міться жатися
SFX ^ тися нуся татися
SFX ^ тися нусь татися
SFX ^ тися нешся татися
SFX ^ тися неться татися
SFX ^ тися немося татися
SFX ^ тися немось татися
SFX ^ тися нетеся татися
SFX ^ тися нетесь татися
SFX ^ тися нуться татися
SFX ^ тися нься татися
SFX ^ тися ньмося татися
SFX ^ тися ньмось татися
SFX ^ тися ньтеся татися
SFX ^ тися ньтесь татися
SFX ^ істися ядуся істися
SFX ^ істися ядусь істися
SFX ^ істися ядешся істися
SFX ^ істися ядеться істися
SFX ^ істися ядемося істися
SFX ^ істися ядемось істися
SFX ^ істися ядетеся істися
SFX ^ істися ядетесь істися
SFX ^ істися ядуться істися
SFX ^ стися лася істися
SFX ^ стися лась істися
SFX ^ стися лося істися
SFX ^ стися лось істися
SFX ^ стися лися істися
SFX ^ стися лись істися
SFX ^ стися вся істися
SFX ^ стися всь істися
SFX ^ стися вшись істися
SFX ^ стися вшися істися ###
SFX ^ істися ядься істися
SFX ^ істися ядьмося істися
SFX ^ істися ядьмось істися
SFX ^ істися ядьтеся істися
SFX ^ істися ядьтесь істися
SFX ^ ти ну тати
SFX ^ ти неш тати
SFX ^ ти не тати
SFX ^ ти немо тати
SFX ^ ти нете тати
SFX ^ ти нуть тати
SFX ^ ти нь тати
SFX ^ ти ньмо тати
SFX ^ ти ньте тати
SFX ^ ся сь тися
SFX ^ нути ла нути
SFX ^ нути ло нути
SFX ^ нути ли нути
SFX ^ нути нула нути
SFX ^ нути нуло нути
SFX ^ нути нули нути
SFX ^ нути нув нути
SFX ^ нути нувши нути
SFX ^ ути у нути
SFX ^ ути еш нути
SFX ^ ути е нути
SFX ^ ути емо нути
SFX ^ ути ете нути
SFX ^ ути уть нути
SFX ^ тися нися [бгзкпх]тися
SFX ^ тися нись [бгзкпх]тися
SFX ^ тися німося [бгзкпх]тися
SFX ^ тися німось [бгзкпх]тися
SFX ^ тися німся [бгзкпх]тися
SFX ^ тися ніться [бгзкпх]тися
SFX ^ битися іб'юся [бдз]битися
SFX ^ битися іб'юсь [бдз]битися
SFX ^ битися іб'єшся [бдз]битися
SFX ^ битися іб'ється [бдз]битися
SFX ^ битися іб'ємося [бдз]битися
SFX ^ битися іб'ємось [бдз]битися
SFX ^ битися іб'єтеся [бдз]битися
SFX ^ битися іб'єтесь [бдз]битися
SFX ^ битися іб'ються [бдз]битися
SFX ^ тітися чуся тітися
SFX ^ тітися чусь тітися
SFX ^ тітися чешся тітися
SFX ^ тітися четься тітися
SFX ^ тітися чемося тітися
SFX ^ тітися чемось тітися
SFX ^ тітися четеся тітися
SFX ^ тітися четесь тітися
SFX ^ тітися чуться тітися
SFX ^ нути 0 [^аеєиіїоуя]нути
SFX ^ нути ши [^аеєиіїоуя]нути
SFX ^ итися 'юся (^|[^бдзс])[бвп]итися
SFX ^ итися 'юсь (^|[^бдзс])[бвп]итися
SFX ^ итися 'єшся (^|[^бдзс])[бвп]итися
SFX ^ итися 'ється (^|[^бдзс])[бвп]итися
