runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
бліднути/^|w
брезкнути/^|w
вбити/^n
ввергти/^
ввібрати/^(
ввігнати/^(
ввіссати/^(
вгаснути/^
вдати/^
вдіти/^
вдягти/^
вибити/^n
вибліднути/^
вигаснути/^
видатися/^
видохти/^
вимерзти/^
вимолотися/^
випити/^n
випродати/^(
виснути/^|wZ
виссати/^(
вистигти/^
вити/^|w[Q
витиснутися/^
витрухнути/^
витягтися/^
вихолонутися/^
вичовгти/^
відбити/^n
відвикнути/^
відвологти/^
віддати/^(
відібрати/^(
відігнати/^(
відідрати/^(
відізвати/^(
відіпрати/^(
відіссати/^(
відлипнути/^
відлитися/^
відмерзнути/^
відмокнути/^
відпитися/^
відпродати/^(
відсохнути/^
відтанути/^
відтиснути/^On
відтягти/^
відхотіти/^
вкиснути/^
вклякти/^
влити/^n
вмерзнути/^
вмокнути/^n
вмолотися/^
впити/^`
вповити/^n
всісти/^
всохти/^
встати/^
встрягти/^
втиснути/^On
втихнути/^
втухнути/^
втягтися/^
гаснути/^|w
глухнути/^|w
гнатися/^|
гуснути/^|w
датися/^
дістатися/^
дітися/^
добитися/^
довити/^n
додати/^(
докиснути/^
допити/^n
дорозпродати/^(
досохти/^
доссатися/^
достигти/^
дотанути/^
дотиснутися/^
дотягтися/^
жовкнути/^|w
забити/^n
заблиснути/^
забрезкнути/^
зав'язти/^
завдати/^(
завергти/^
завити/^n[
загаснути/^
загрузти/^
загускнути/^
задати/^(
задіти/^n
задубти/^
закацюбти/^
закиснути/^
закоцюбти/^
замерзти/^
замовкти/^
замолоти/^
запахнути/^
заподіти/^n
запосягти/^
заприсягти/^O
запродати/^(
запухнути/^
заревіти/^
заслабти/^
засліпнути/^
засохти/^
зассатися/^
застигти/^
застряти/^
затверднути/^
затиснути/^On
затихнути/^
затягти/^
захляти/^
захотіти/^
захряснути/^
захтіти/^
зачахнути/^
зашерхнути/^
защухнути/^
збитися/^
збліднути/^
звати/^|w(
звергти/^
звикнути/^
звиснути/^
звитися/^
згіркнути/^
здати/^(
здогнати/^
зжовкнути/^
зібрати/^(
зів'яти/^
зідрати/^(
зіссати/^
злити/ZM|w^n
зм'якнути/^
змерзнутися/^
змерзтися/^
змеркти/^
змовкнути/^
змокти/^
зникнути/^
зодягтися/^
зсісти/^
зслизнути/^
зсохнутися/^
зсохтися/^
зустрітися/^
киснути/^|w
липнути/^|w
мерзти/^
мерхнути/^|w
мокнути/^|w
набити/^n
набриднути/^
набухнути/^
нависнути/^
навитися/^
надатися/^
надбитися/^
надібрати/^(
надіти/^n
надлити/^n
надсісти/^
надсохнути/^
накиснути/^
намерзти/^
намокнути/^
напитися/^
напосістися/^
наревітися/^
насістися/^
насохнути/^
нассатися/^
настигти/^
натиснутися/^
натягтися/^
недовідпочити/^
недоздати/^(
недопитися/^
недотиснути/^n
нишкнути/^|w
оббитися/^
обвикнутися/^
обвити/^n
обдати/^(
обібрати/^(
обігнати/^(
обідрати/^(
обіпрати/^(
обкиснути/^
облитися/^
обмерзти/^
обпитися/^
обриднути/^
обсістися/^
обстати/^
обтиснути/^nO
обтягти/^
огиднути/^
одбити/^n
оддати/^(
одігнати/^(
одпити/^n
одтанути/^
одягтися/^
оклякнути/^
оповитися/^
опочити/^
осісти/^
ослабнути/^
осліпнути/^
остигти/^
осягти/^
отягти/^
охляти/^
охрипнути/^
перебити/^n
перевдягти/^
перевидати/^(
перевиснути/^
перевитися/^
перегіркнути/^
передати/^(
передохнути/^
передратися/^
передягтися/^
перездати/^(
перезібрати/^(
перекиснути/^
перемокти/^
переодягти/^
перепити/^n
переповити/^n
переподати/^(
перепродати/^(
пересістися/^
пересохти/^
перестигнути/^
перестрітися/^
перетиснутися/^
перетягти/^
перехолонути/^
перехтіти/^
підбити/^n
підвиснути/^
підвитися/^
піддатися/^
підібрати/^(
підігнати/^(
підізвати/^(
підкиснути/Z^
підлити/^n
підмерзти/^
підпити/^
підсісти/^
підтиснути/^On
підтягтися/^
поблякнути/^
повити/^n[
погіркнути/^
податися/^
пожовкнути/^
померзти/^
поникнути/^
попогудіти/^
попухнути/^
посліпти/^
поссати/^
посягти/^
потиснутися/^
потягтися/^
почахнути/^
прибити/^n
привикнути/^
придатися/^
примеркти/^
приодягти/^
присісти/^
приссати/^
пристигти/^
притиснутися/^
притягти/^
пробити/^n
прогудіти/^
прокиснути/^
проникнути/^
проревіти/^
простягти/^
протиснути/^On
протягтися/^
ревіти/^|
розбухнути/^
роздати/^(
розібрати/^(
розідрати/^(
розкиснути/^
розмерзтися/^
розпити/^n
розпродати/^(
розсістися/^
розтиснути/^On
розхотіти/^
скреснути/^
слатися/Z|w^
сперти/^n
сповити/^n
сприсягтися/^
спухнутися/^
статися/^
стертися/^
стихнути/^
стягти/^
схрипнути/Z^
терпнути/^|w
трухнути/Z^|w
убитися/^
увиснути/^
увібратися/^
угрузнути/^
удягти/^
улипнути/^
уникнути/^n
уповитися/^
усохти/^
устряти/^
утягти/^
хляти/^|
чахнути/^|w
